Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.355

Action by person removed from premises pursuant to RCW 9A.52.105—Damages, costs, attorneys' fees.

All persons removed from premises pursuant to RCW 9A.52.105 on the basis of false statements made by a declarant pursuant to RCW 9A.52.115 shall have a cause of action to recover from the declarant for actual damages, together with costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

[ 2017 c 284 s 3.]